District of Columbia statutes.
19-320

Felonious homicide as barring inheritance; insurance policies; bona fide purchasers.

(a)

A person convicted of felonious homicide of another person, by way of murder or manslaughter, takes no estate or interest in property of any kind from that other person by way of:

(1)

inheritance, distribution, devise, or bequest; or

(2)

remainder, reversion, or executory devise dependent upon the death of the other person.

The estate, interest, or property to which the person so convicted would have succeeded or would have taken in any way from or after the death of the decedent goes, instead, as if the person so convicted had died before the decedent.

(b)

Policies of insurance directly or indirectly procured by a person convicted as specified by subsection (a) of this section, for his own benefit or payable to him upon the life of the person killed by him, are void.

(c)

This section does not affect the rights of bona fide purchasers of property specified by subsection (a) of this section, for value and without notice.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 700, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-604.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-320.
1973 Ed., § 19-320.